Hawaii statutes.
§412:11-106 Injunctions. If it
appears to the commissioner that any person has committed or is about to commit
a violation of any provision of this article or any rule or order of the
commissioner, the commissioner may apply to the circuit court for an order
enjoining such person from violating or continuing to violate this article or
any rule or order and for injunctive relief as the nature of the case or the
interests of the financial institution or the financial institution holding
company or its depositors, beneficiaries, creditors or shareholders may
require. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Rules of Court

Injunctions, see HRCP rule 65.

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next